Georgia, session 2025_26, HB497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 42 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
conditions of detention generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"42-5-58.1.
It shall be unlawful for any sheriff, jailer, or other officer to require any person imprisoned
in a penal institution to appear in any court for trial dressed in the uniform or dress of a
prisoner or inmate, or in any uniform or apparel other than ordinary civilian dress, or with
a shaved or clipped head. No person charged with a criminal offense shall be tried in any
court while dressed in the uniform or dress of a prisoner or inmate, or in any uniform or
apparel other than ordinary civilian dress, or with a head shaved or clipped by or under the
H. B. 497
- 1 -

LC 48 1430
direction or requirement of any sheriff, jailer, or other officer, unless the head was shaved
or clipped while such person was serving a term of imprisonment for the commission of
a crime. Any sheriff, jailer, or other officer who violates the provisions of this Code
section shall upon conviction be guilty of a misdemeanor."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 497
- 2 -